src/morphology/roots/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:nuoritta{#}pareitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:nuorilta{#}pareilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:nuorilla{#}pareilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:nuorille{#}pareille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:nuorista{#}pareista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:nuorina{#}pareina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:nuorien{#}parien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:nuorten{#}parien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:nuorissa{#}pareissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:nuoret{#}parit   Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:nuoria{#}pareja Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:nuoriksi{#}pareikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:nuoriksi{#}pareiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:nuoretta{#}paritta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:nuorelta{#}parilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:nuorella{#}parilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:nuorelle{#}parille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:nuoresta{#}parista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:nuorena{#}parina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:nuoren{#}parin Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:nuoressa{#}parissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:nuori{#}pari Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:nuori{#}pari Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:nuorta{#}paria Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:nuoreksi{#}parikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=nuori'|'pari][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:nuoreksi{#}pariksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:omitta{#}kuvitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:omilta{#}kuvilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:omilla{#}kuvilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:omille{#}kuville Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:omista{#}kuvista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:omina{#}kuvina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:omien{#}kuvien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:omissa{#}kuvissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:omat{#}kuvat Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:omia{#}kuvia Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:omiksi{#}kuvikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:omiksi{#}kuviksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:omatta{#}kuvatta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:omalta{#}kuvalta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:omalla{#}kuvalla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:omalle{#}kuvalle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:omasta{#}kuvasta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:omana{#}kuvana Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:oman{#}kuvan Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:omassa{#}kuvassa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:oma{#}kuva Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:oma{#}kuva Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:omaa{#}kuvaa Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:omaksi{#}kuvakse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'kuva][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:omaksi{#}kuvaksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:omitta{#}tunnoitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:omilta{#}tunnoilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:omilla{#}tunnoilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:omille{#}tunnoille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:omista{#}tunnoista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:omina{#}tuntoina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:omien{#}tuntojen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:omissa{#}tunnoissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:omat{#}tunnot Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:omia{#}tuntoja Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:omiksi{#}tunnoikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:omiksi{#}tunnoiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:omatta{#}tunnotta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:omalta{#}tunnolta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:omalla{#}tunnolla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:omalle{#}tunnolle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:omasta{#}tunnosta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:omana{#}tuntona Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:oman{#}tunnon Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:omassa{#}tunnossa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:oma{#}tunto Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:omaa{#}tuntoa Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:omaksi{#}tunnokse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=oma'|'tunto][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:omaksi{#}tunnoksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:pahoitta{#}hengittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:pahoilta{#}hengiltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:pahoilla{#}hengillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:pahoille{#}hengille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:pahoista{#}hengistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:pahoina{#}henkinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:pahojen{#}henkien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:pahoissa{#}hengissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:pahat{#}henget Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:pahoia{#}henkiä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:pahoiksi{#}hengikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:pahoiksi{#}hengiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:pahatta{#}hengettä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:pahalta{#}hengeltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:pahalla{#}hengellä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:pahalle{#}hengelle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:pahasta{#}hengestä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:pahana{#}henkenä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:pahan{#}hengen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:pahassa{#}hengessä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:paha{#}henki Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:paha{#}henki Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:pahaa{#}henkeä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:pahaksi{#}hengekse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'henki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:pahaksi{#}hengeksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=paha'|'putki][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:paha{#}putki Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:palavitta{#}kivittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:palavilta{#}kiviltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:palavilla{#}kivillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:palaville{#}kiville Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:palavista{#}kivistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:palavina{#}kivinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:palavien{#}kivien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:palavissa{#}kivissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:palavat{#}kivet Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:palavia{#}kiviä Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:palaviksi{#}kivikse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:palaviksi{#}kiviksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:palavatta{#}kivettä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:palavalta{#}kiveltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:palavalla{#}kivellä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:palavalle{#}kivelle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:palavasta{#}kivestä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:palavana{#}kivenä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:palavan{#}kiven Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:palavassa{#}kivessä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:palava{#}kivi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:palava{#}kivi Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:palavaa{#}kiveä  Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:palavaksi{#}kivekse Possessive/Obligatory ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'kivi][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:palavaksi{#}kiveksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'pensas][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:palavitta{#}pensaitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'pensas][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:palavilta{#}pensailta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'pensas][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:palavilla{#}pensailla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'pensas][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:palaville{#}pensaille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=palava'|'pensas][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:palavista{#}pensaista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
